Utah statutes.
75-7-501.   Rights of beneficiary's creditor or assignee.

To the extent a beneficiary's interest is not protected by a spendthrift provision or Section 25-6-14, the court may authorize a creditor or assignee of the beneficiary to reach the beneficiary's interest by attachment of present or future distributions to or for the benefit of the beneficiary or other means.  The court may limit the award to relief as is appropriate under the circumstances.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

